Utah statutes.
17-30-18.   Demotion, reduction in pay, suspension or discharge -- Grounds
-- How made.
(1) A merit system officer holding a permanent appointment may be demoted,
reduced in pay, suspended, or discharged for:
(a)  neglect of duty;
(b)  disobedience of a reasonable order;
(c)  misconduct;
(d)  inefficiency, or inability to satisfactorily perform assigned duties;
(e)  any act inimical to the public service.
(2)  No officer shall be suspended for more than thirty days at one time, nor
more than sixty days in one year. Demotion, reduction in pay, suspension, or
discharge shall be made upon order of the appointing authority.
